Wyoming, session 2026, HB0135.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-4-701 and 16-4-702 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 7
PUBLIC OFFICIAL NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENTS
HB0135

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0482

16-4-701. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Government entity" means any municipal,
county or state government in Wyoming and any agency,
department or entity thereof;

(ii) "Public funds" means any money, funds,
credit, property, tax benefit, subsidy, grant, loan,
deferral or infrastructure support provided by a government
entity;

(iii) "Public-funded project" means any
proposal, negotiation, agreement or activity that uses or
commits public funds or that creates any ongoing
obligation, financial liability, land-use impact,
infrastructure demand or utility load on a Wyoming city,
town or county or a government entity;

(iv) "Public official" means any officer,
employee, agent or servant of a government entity,
HB0135

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0482
including elected or appointed officials and persons acting
on behalf of the government entity in any official
capacity, whether with or without compensation.

16-4-702. Public officials; certain nondisclosure
agreements prohibited; penalties; remedies.

(a) No public official shall enter into any
nondisclosure agreement or any other agreement that
prohibits, prevents or precludes the public official from
disclosing any information related to any one (1) or more
of the following:

(i) The use or commitment of public funds;

(ii) Any public obligations, incentives or
financial liabilities to be disbursed, awarded or incurred
under the agreement;

(iii) Impacts on land use, valuation,
infrastructure, water or power;

HB0135

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0482
(iv) Information otherwise subject to disclosure
under the Public Records Act or information that is
required to be disclosed or provided in an open meeting
under W.S. 16-4-401 through 16-4-408.

(b) Any agreement entered into in violation of
subsection (a) of this section is void and unenforceable as
contrary to public policy.

(c) No public official shall negotiate or pursue any
public-funded project if another party requires
nondisclosure as a condition of discussion or due
diligence.

(d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
prohibit or prevent a public official from protecting or
limiting information from disclosure only to the extent
permitted under W.S. 16-4-203(d).

(e) Any public official who violates this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction by a
fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

HB0135

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0482
(f) Violation of this section constitutes sufficient
cause for termination of a public employee's employment or
for removal of a public official from the official's office
or position. Any removal or termination based on cause
specified in this subsection shall be in accordance with
law.

(g) Any resident of Wyoming shall have standing to
seek a declaratory judgment or injunctive relief to void an
agreement or contract entered into in violation of this
section.

Section 2.

(a) This act shall apply to all agreements and
contracts entered into on and after the effective date of
this act.

(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter,
amend or impair any agreement or contract entered into
before the effective date of this act.

HB0135

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0482
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0135